Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1336.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8320.2. Deprivation of rights.(a) Prohibitions.--(1) A person, whether or not acting under color of law, may not subject or cause to be subjected any other person to the deprivation of any substantive due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution of the United States or laws of the United States or any substantive rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution of Pennsylvania or laws of this Commonwealth.(2) A person, whether or not acting under color of law, 123456789101112131415161718 may not interfere or attempt to interfere by threats, intimidation or coercion with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person of any substantive due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution of the United States or laws of the United States or any substantive rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution of Pennsylvania or laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Actions by Attorney General or district attorney.--(1) The Attorney General or any district attorney may bring a civil action for a violation of subsection (a), which shall be brought in the name of the Commonwealth and may be brought on behalf of the injured party.(2) If the Attorney General or district attorney prevails in an action brought under this subsection, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the Attorney General or district attorney. The court may also award one or more of the following remedies:(i) Injunctive relief.(ii) Damages which shall be awarded to the injured party.(iii) A civil penalty up to $25,000 for each violation.(iv) Other appropriate relief.(c) Civil action.--A person aggrieved by a violation of subsection (a) may bring a civil action for damages and injunctive or other appropriate relief. If a party prevails in an action under this subsection, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1336PN1735 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930